Hawaii statutes.
§334-129 Failure to comply with assisted
community treatment. (a) A treating psychiatrist may prescribe or
administer to the subject of the order reasonable and appropriate medication or
medications, if specifically authorized by the court order, and treatment which
is consistent with accepted medical standards and the family court order,
including the written treatment plan submitted pursuant to section 334-126(h).

(b) No subject of the order shall be
physically forced to take medication under a family court order for assisted
community treatment unless the subject is within an emergency department or
admitted to a hospital, subsequent to the date of the current assisted
community treatment order.

(c) A subject may be transported to a
designated mental health program, or a hospital emergency department, for
failure to comply with an order for assisted community treatment via the
following methods:

(1) By an interested party with the consent of the
subject of the order; or

(2) In accordance with section 334-59.

(d) The designated mental health program's
treating psychiatrist or psychiatrist's designee shall make all reasonable
efforts to solicit the subject's compliance with the prescribed treatment. If
the subject fails or refuses to comply after the efforts to solicit compliance,
the treating psychiatrist shall assess whether the subject of the order meets
criteria for admission to a psychiatric facility under part IV of this chapter,
and proceed with the admission pursuant to section 334-59(a)(2) or (3);
provided that the refusal of treatment shall not, by itself, constitute a basis
for involuntary hospitalization. [L 1984, c 251, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 221, §§15,
24; am L 2016, c 114, §§4, 6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next